Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 11 Prevention of Public Offenses
12-12-103. Pawnshop records — Penalty.

A pawnshop or pawnbroker doing business in the State of Arkansas shall keep a record showing in detail all property pawned or purchased with the pawnshop or pawnbroker.

The records required under subsection (a) of this section shall include:

A detailed record of each transaction, including the type of identification displayed by the person from whom the property was received;

The name, address, race, sex, height, weight, and date of birth of the person from whom the property was received;

The driver's license number, personal identification number issued under § 27-16-805, or the number from another form of photographic identification of the person from whom the property was received; and

A description of each item pawned or purchased, including without limitation the identifying numbers or serial numbers.

One (1) copy of the records required under subsection (a) of this section shall be maintained on file with the pawnshop or pawnbroker for a period of three (3) years.

The Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police, a member of the Division of Arkansas State Police, a county sheriff or deputy of the county, or a police officer of the municipality in which the pawnshop or pawnbroker is located shall have access to the records at any reasonable time.

The director, the county sheriff, or the chief of police in the county or municipality in which the pawnshop or pawnbroker is located may require a report of transactions for a period of time that he or she deems necessary for the efficient enforcement of the criminal laws or to aid in criminal investigations.

The failure of a pawnbroker or an owner or operator of a pawnshop to comply with a provision of this section is a violation punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

Each day a pawnbroker or owner or operator of a pawnshop fails to comply with this section is a separate offense.

Pawnshops and pawnbrokers shall:

Keep the records required by this section in a designated electronic format; and

Daily upload the records in the designated electronic format to:

A centralized secure tracking system and internet website designated by the chief law enforcement officer of a county, city, or local government; or

A different centralized secure tracking system and internet website other than the centralized secure tracking system and internet website designated under subdivision (e)(1)(B)(i) of this section if designated by county or municipal ordinance.

The electronic records submitted under this subsection shall be used for the sole purpose of investigating crimes. Pawnshops, pawnbrokers, and pawn customers shall not be required to incur any costs or increased fees as a result of the city, county, or state collecting and processing records required by this section electronically.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment substituted “violation” for “misdemeanor” in (d)(1).

The 2013 amendment by No. 404 rewrote (a); redesignated (b)(1) as (b); deleted “and every” following “each” in (b)(A) (now (b)(1)); substituted “another” for “some other” in (b)(C) (now (b)(3)); rewrote (b)(D) (now (b)(4)); deleted former (b)(2); and rewrote (c)(2), (d), and (e).

The 2013 amendment by No. 1293 redesignated former (b)(A) through (D) as (b)(1) through (4); deleted the (b)(4)(i) designation; and deleted (b)(4)(ii).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” twice in (c)(1)(B).

Ark. L. Rev.

Nickles and Adams, Pawnbrokers, Police, and Property Rights — A Proposed Constitutional Balance, 47 Ark. L. Rev. 793.

Cited: Landers v. Jameson, 355 Ark. 163, 132 S.W.3d 741 (2003).

Permanent following any conviction for a violent offense;

For twenty-five (25) years following any conviction for a sex offense; and

For seven (7) years following any conviction for any other felony for which the defendant's genetic profile may be taken by a law enforcement agency and submitted for comparison to the State DNA Data Base for unsolved offenses.

After a conviction is entered, the prosecuting attorney or law enforcement agency having custody of the evidence may petition the court with notice to the defendant for entry of an order allowing disposition of the evidence if, after a hearing and a reasonable period of time in which to respond, the court determines by a preponderance of the evidence that:

The court may order the disposition of the evidence if the defendant is allowed the opportunity to take reasonable measures to remove or preserve portions of the evidence in question for future testing.

(1)It is unlawful for any person to purposely fail to comply with the provisions of this section.

As used in this section:

“Law enforcement agency” means any police force or organization whose primary responsibility as established by statute or ordinance is the enforcement of the criminal laws, traffic laws, or highway laws of this state;

“Sex offense” means:

Rape, § 5-14-103;

Sexual indecency with a child, § 5-14-110;

Sexual assault in the first degree, § 5-14-124;

Sexual assault in the second degree, § 5-14-125;

Sexual assault in the third degree, § 5-14-126;

Sexual assault in the fourth degree, § 5-14-127;

Incest, § 5-26-202;

Engaging children in sexually explicit conduct for use in visual or print medium, § 5-27-303;

Transportation of minors for prohibited sexual conduct, § 5-27-305;

Employing or consenting to use of child in sexual performance, § 5-27-402;

Producing, directing, or promoting a sexual performance by a child, § 5-27-403;

Computer child pornography, § 5-27-603;

Computer exploitation of a child in the first degree, § 5-27-605(a);

Promoting prostitution in the first degree, § 5-70-104;

Stalking, § 5-71-229;

An attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to commit any of the offenses enumerated in this subdivision (f)(2);

A violation of any former law of this state that is substantially equivalent to any of the offenses enumerated in this subdivision (f)(2); or

Sexual extortion, § 5-14-113; and

“Violent offense” means:

Capital murder, § 5-10-101, murder in the first degree, § 5-10-102, or murder in the second degree, § 5-10-103;

Manslaughter, § 5-10-104;

Kidnapping, § 5-11-102;

False imprisonment in the first degree, § 5-11-103;

Permanent detention or restraint, § 5-11-106;

Robbery, § 5-12-102;

Aggravated robbery, § 5-12-103;

Battery in the first degree, § 5-13-201;

Battery in the second degree, § 5-13-202;

Aggravated assault, § 5-13-204;

Terroristic threatening in the first degree, § 5-13-301;

Domestic battering in the first degree, §5-26-303, domestic battering in the second degree, § 5-26-304, and domestic battering in the third degree, § 5-26-305;

Aggravated assault on family or household member, § 5-26-306;

Engaging in a continuing criminal gang, organization, or enterprise, § 5-74-104;

An attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to commit any of the offenses enumerated in this subdivision (f)(3);

A violation of any former law of this state that is substantially equivalent to any of the offenses enumerated in this subdivision (f)(3); or

Aggravated assault upon a law enforcement officer or an employee of a correctional facility, § 5-13-211, if a Class Y felony.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2001, No. 1780, § 1, provided:

“The General Assembly finds that the mission of the criminal justice system is to punish the guilty and to exonerate the innocent. The General Assembly further finds that Arkansas laws and procedures should be changed in order to accommodate the advent of new technologies enhancing the ability to analyze scientific evidence.”

Amendments. The 2011 amendment rewrote (f)(2) and (f)(3).

The 2017 amendment by No. 367 added (f)(3)(Q).

The 2017 amendment by No. 664 added (f)(2)(R).

Cross References. Appeals — New scientific evidence, §16-112-201 et seq.

Fines, §5-4-201.

Imprisonment, §5-4-401.

Petition, §16-112-103.

Statute of limitations, §5-1-109.

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

Survey of Legislation, 2001 Arkansas General Assembly, Criminal Law, 24 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 429.

Each state and local law enforcement agency shall electronically file a report on the form provided and required by the El Paso Intelligence Center of the United States Drug Enforcement Administration with the Arkansas Crime Information Center within ten (10) days of the agency's seizure of:

Have been utilized in the illegal manufacture of a controlled substance;

Be currently utilized in the illegal manufacture of a controlled substance; or

Be intended for utilization in the illegal manufacture of a controlled substance.

The report described in subsection (a) of this section shall be on the form provided and required by the El Paso Intelligence Center of the United States Drug Enforcement Administration and shall contain any additional information required by the Arkansas Drug Director.

(1)The Arkansas Crime Information Center shall forward the report described in subsection (a) of this section to the El Paso Intelligence Center of the United States Drug Enforcement Administration and other law enforcement or criminal justice agencies designated by the Arkansas Drug Director.

(1)The Director of the State Crime Laboratory shall catalogue the number of controlled substance laboratories reported to the State Crime Laboratory through evidence submission.

Judicial district where the controlled substance laboratory was located;

Date of seizure of the controlled substance laboratory; and

Name of the seizing law enforcement agency.

A.C.R.C. Notes. As enacted by Acts 2005, No. 1873, § 1, subdivision (e)(1) read “… after the effective date of this section …”.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the State Crime Laboratory” for “Executive Director of the State Crime Laboratory” in (d)(1) and the introductory language of (d)(2).

(1)On March 31, June 30, September 30, and December 31 of each year after August 12, 2005, the Arkansas Drug Director shall compare the number of reports made to him or her under subsection (a) of this section with the number of reports made to the State Crime Laboratory under subsection (d) of this section.

The failure of any law enforcement agency to comply with a requirement of this section may be considered by a state board or agency as a factor for the withholding of awards or grant moneys or other funds that relate to controlled substance enforcement.

A law enforcement officer, prosecuting attorney, or other government official shall not ask or require an adult victim of an alleged sex offense, a youth victim of an alleged sex offense, or a child victim of an alleged sex offense to submit to a polygraph examination or an examination of any other truth-telling device as a condition of proceeding with the investigation of an alleged sex offense.

The refusal of a victim of an alleged sex offense to submit to an examination described in subsection (a) of this section shall not prevent the investigation, charging, or prosecution of the alleged sex offense.

As used in this section:

A health care provider may report to a law enforcement agency an injury to an adult that the health care provider has reason to believe is the result of a battery or other physically abusive conduct, including physical injuries resulting from domestic violence, if the:

A health care provider that makes a report under subdivision (b)(2) of this section shall promptly inform the injured adult that the report has been or will be made.

A report under this section shall state the name of the injured adult and the character and extent of the adult's injuries.

A report under this section shall be made to one (1) or more of the following law enforcement agencies:

A health care provider making or deciding not to make a report in good faith under this section is immune from criminal or civil liability for making or deciding not to make the report.

When a law enforcement agency responds to a report of domestic violence, the first law enforcement officer to interview a victim of domestic violence shall assess the potential for danger by asking a series of questions provided on a lethality assessment form.

The lethality assessment form shall be completed with the following information from the victim:

Whether the offender ever tried to choke the victim;

Whether the offender is violently or constantly jealous;

Whether the offender controls most of the victim's daily activities;

The victim's current living situation and if he or she has recently left or separated from the offender after living together or being married;

The victim's employment status;

Whether the offender has ever attempted suicide to the best of the victim's knowledge;

Whether the victim has a child that the offender believes is not the offender's biological child;

Whether the offender follows, spies on, or leaves threatening messages for the victim; and

Any other pertinent information, including any other conditions or circumstances that concern the victim regarding his or her safety.

Publisher's Notes. For codification of Acts 2015, No. 163, § 1, see §14-1-102.

Records described under subdivision (d)(2)(A) of this section are considered confidential and shall not be released to the public;

(A)Utilize the National Missing and Unidentified Persons System's family reference sample submission kits and obtain voluntary DNA samples from appropriate family members to submit to the laboratory for DNA testing and to an institution of higher education that specializes in DNA identification for a full genetic profile, including testing of mitochondrial DNA, short tandem repeats on the Y-chromosome, and nuclear analyses, to be documented in the National Missing and Unidentified Persons System missing persons or unidentified persons file, and submitted to the Federal Bureau of Investigation's National DNA Index System using the Combined DNA Index System.

If necessary, the law enforcement agency may request assistance in obtaining family reference DNA samples; and

Attempt to locate any fingerprints from available resources and submit the fingerprints to the National Missing and Unidentified Persons System.

(1)A law enforcement agency shall not require a delay before accepting or investigating a report of a missing person when reliable information has been provided to the law enforcement agency that the person is missing.

(1)If a law enforcement agency receives a report of a missing person from another law enforcement agency or from a medical examiner, the law enforcement agency shall maintain a record of the case file.

A law enforcement agency shall not establish or maintain a policy that requires the observance of a waiting period before accepting and investigating a report of a missing child.

Upon receipt of a report of a missing child, a law enforcement agency shall enter the child into the National Missing and Unidentified Persons System.

When a person previously reported missing has been found or when an unidentified person has been identified, the reporting law enforcement agency or the Division of Arkansas State Police shall report to the National Missing and Unidentified Persons System.

This section does not prohibit a law enforcement agency from maintaining case files related to missing persons or unidentified bodies.

Cross References. Missing and unidentified persons training, §12-9-123.

Preambles. Acts 1971, No. 286 contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, proper law enforcement, improved public safety and effective administration of justice requires complete and timely information on crime, highway safety problems and the Criminal Justice System; and

“Whereas, advances in computer and related communications technology now make it both practical and feasible to obtain such data more rapidly and in greater detail than heretofore possible; and

“Whereas, State resources and Federal funds are now at work in the development of a comprehensive computer-based Criminal Justice and Highway Safety Information System for Arkansas; and

“Whereas, installation of such a system will help apprehend criminals, improve the efficiency of criminal justice agencies, and ultimately help reduce crime; and

“Whereas, statistics are needed to aid in determining the cause and amount of crime in this State, to form a basis for the study of crime, police methods, court procedure, highway safety problems, penal problems and to plan effective programs for combating crime; and

“Whereas, a Supervisory Board working closely with criminal justice agencies is needed to administer and control the use and operation of the system; and

“Whereas, it is the intent of the Legislature to safeguard all persons from the misuse of criminal records by any person or agency and to provide adequate safeguards and limitations on the use of all criminal history records….”

Effective Dates. Acts 1971, No. 286, § 11: July 1, 1971.

Acts 1975, No. 742, § 17: July 1, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly, that the maintenance of an adequate Criminal Justice and Highway Safety Information System is essential to law enforcement in this state, and that the establishment of said program in the Department of Public Safety is necessary to enable proper coordination and maximum use of the services of the program, and that the immediate passage of this act is necessary in order that this transfer may be made and be effective by July 1, 1975, in the event of an extension of this regular session of the General Assembly. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1975.”

Acts 1979, No. 124, § 3: July 1, 1979.

Acts 1981, No. 612, § 3: Mar. 23, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the authority of the Arkansas Crime Information Center to collect and maintain this information is essential for law enforcement in this state, and is necessary for the most efficient use of the computerized system of the Arkansas Crime Information Center. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1983, No. 214, § 6: July 1, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Fourth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two-year period; that the effectiveness of this act on July 1, 1983 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this act beyond July 1, 1983 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1983.”

Acts 1983, No. 282, § 3: Feb. 25, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the authority of the Arkansas Crime Information Center to collect and maintain this information is essential for law enforcement and other criminal justice agencies in this state, and is necessary for the most efficient use of the computerized system of the Arkansas Crime Information Center. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1994 (2nd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 37 and 38, § 7: Aug. 25, 1994. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that serious criminal offenses committed by juveniles have increased to an alarming level and that it will help to deal with these serious juvenile crimes by authorizing the Arkansas Crime Information Center to accumulate juvenile arrest information for those allegations and adjudications of dependency for which the Arkansas Juvenile Code authorizes fingerprints to be taken and maintained, and it will assist in juvenile crime prevention to allow the dissemination of conviction information to nongovernmental entities authorized by federal law; that this act so provides; and this act should go into effect immediately in order to provide additional tools for dealing with juvenile crime as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1995, No. 995, § 8: Oct. 1, 1995.

Acts 1997, No. 243, § 5: Feb. 24, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that, as future officers of the court, it is necessary to assure applicants for admission to the bar of Arkansas are free of criminal records, and that giving the Arkansas State Board of Law Examiners access to the records of the Arkansas Crime Information Center provides another tool with which to verify information received on applications. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto. ”

Acts 1997, No. 250, § 258: Feb. 24, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 1211 of 1995 established the procedure for all state boards and commissions to follow regarding reimbursement of expenses and stipends for board members; that this act amends various sections of the Arkansas Code which are in conflict with the Act 1211 of 1995; and that until this cleanup act becomes effective conflicting laws will exist. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governer, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1997, No. 911, § 16: July 1, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-First General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1997 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1997 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1997.”

Acts 1997, No. 1354, § 51: Apr. 14, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act affects the method of selection of alternate members of the Legislative Council and Legislative Joint Auditing Committee and that this act is immediately necessary for proper continuity and efficiency in State government. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1999, No. 1109, § 5: Apr. 5, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that due to critical changes being made by the Federal Bureau of Investigation in the National Crime Information System, and because those changes will have a major impact on law enforcement agencies in Arkansas, and to prepare for those changes, the Arkansas Crime Information Center is required to implement new equipment and systems by July 1, 1999. The Arkansas Crime Information Center must immediately revise its reimbursement procedures in order to finance the required changes. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2003, No. 998, § 4: July 1, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the lack of compliance with the motor vehicle liability insurance law is epidemic in this state; that the owners of motor vehicles that have not complied with mandatory insurance requirements increase the potential financial catastrophe to others involved in accidents with them; that this act is designed and intended to provide enforcement provisions and to ensure increased compliance with the motor vehicle liability insurance law of this state; and that the enactment of new and enhanced penalties and requirements will increase compliance with the motor vehicle liability insurance law. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2003.”

Acts 2003, No. 1031, § 7: Apr. 2, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the ‘Task Force to Study the Disparity in Sentencing for Persons Convicted of Non-violent Crimes’ has found that it appears that some Arkansas citizens do not receive equitable sentences under the law; that it is necessary to compile statistical sentencing information in order to determine if disparities exist; and that this act is immediately necessary to allow the compiling of the needed statistical information in the first quarter of 2003. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2007, No. 463, § 6: July 1, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that federal law prohibits the sale of firearms to persons who have been committed to a mental institution; that it is the intent of this act to require the submission of information to create a confidential database that may only be used for firearm sales or transactions; and that this act is necessary because possession of a firearm by a person that is suicidal, homicidal, or gravely disabled poses an critical threat of harm to the citizens of this state. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

Publisher's Notes. The Criminal Justice and Highway Safety Information Center was established under the supervision of a supervisory board and the former Department of Administration by Acts 1971, No. 286, § 1.

Acts 1975, No. 742, §§ 11-14, transferred the center and its functions, equipment, and personnel to the Department of Public Safety (abolished by Acts 1981, No. 45, § 1). Section 12 further provided that all of the center's personnel would be granted tenure rights on or after July 1, 1975, and that all position, grade, step, and anniversary dates, as established under the state's compensation plan, would remain as assigned to the position of each employee on or after that date, or as provided by the new compensation plan.

Acts 1979, No. 375, § 1, provided that the Criminal Justice and Highway Safety Information Center would thereafter be known as, and all its functions, powers, and duties would be performed by, the Arkansas Crime Information Center.

Acts 1981, No. 45, § 8, provided, in part, that the Arkansas Crime Information Center and all of its powers, functions, duties, personnel, and funds would be separated from the Department of Public Safety (abolished by Acts 1981, No. 45, § 1) and established as an independent agency of the state government, to function in the same manner as if it had never been located within the Department of Public Safety (abolished by Acts 1981, No. 45, § 1). It further provided that nothing in the act should be construed to reduce any right which an employee of the Arkansas Crime Information Center had under any civil service or merit system.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment, in (b),substituted “the Director of the Arkansas Crime Information Center” for “a director” and inserted “of the Department of Public Safety”; and substituted “in consultation with the Secretary of the Department of Public Safety” for “of the center” in (c).

The Attorney General or one (1) of his or her assistants;

The Chief Justice of the Supreme Court or his or her designated agent;

A member designated by the Arkansas Prosecuting Attorneys Association;

A member designated by the Arkansas Sheriffs' Association;

A member designated by the Arkansas Association of Municipal Judges;

A member designated by the President of the Arkansas Bar Association who is regularly engaged in criminal defense work;

Two (2) citizens of the State of Arkansas, to be appointed by the Governor;

A member designated by the Arkansas Municipal Police Association;

The Director of the Division of Correction or his or her designated agent;

A member designated by the Arkansas Association of Chiefs of Police;

A member designated by the Association of Arkansas Counties;

The Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police or his or her designated agent; and

The Governor or a member of the Governor's staff designated by the Governor.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” in (b)(9), and substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” in (b)(12).

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (a)(5); and deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (b).

Cross References. Arkansas State Criminal Records Act, intent of, §12-12-1502.

Dissemination of criminal history information, §12-12-1504.

Implementation of Arkansas State Criminal Records Act, §12-12-1512.

Release of criminal history information, authorization of, §12-12-1507.

Unrestricted information, records, immunity from civil liability, §12-12-1506.

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning the Arkansas Crime Prevention Office Act, was repealed by Acts 2013, No. 1277, § 1. The section was derived from Acts 1985, No. 402, §§ 1-3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 5-1121 — 5-1123.

Persons reported to be missing; and

Unidentified deceased persons;

Interface with the National Crime Information Center for the exchange of information on:

Missing persons; and

Unidentified deceased persons;

Establish educational services and publications deemed appropriate to aid in dealing with missing persons;

Be authorized to issue rules and procedures for the orderly collection and entry of information on missing persons and unidentified deceased persons, as well as rules governing access to information on missing persons and unidentified deceased persons;

Annually compile and make available statistical information on the number of missing persons and unidentified deceased persons entered into the computerized system of the clearinghouse and, where available, information on the number located; and

Release information upon request to any court in a pending custody proceeding when the court needs information concerning whether a child has been reported as missing.

(1)Upon receiving notice of a missing child, a law enforcement agency shall complete a missing person report and immediately enter identifying and descriptive information about the missing child into the computerized system of the clearinghouse.

Such documentation will aid in the protection of the individual's right of privacy.

Missing adults shall be entered based on categories established by the Federal Bureau of Investigation, and the categories may include disability, endangered, involuntary, or catastrophe victim.

It shall be the duty of the initial investigating law enforcement agency to immediately cancel the computer entry when the missing child or missing adult is located or returned.

No law enforcement agency shall delay an investigation or entry of missing persons information based on an agency rule or policy which specifies an automatic waiting period.

A person shall be deemed guilty of a Class A misdemeanor who knowingly makes to a law enforcement agency:

When the unidentified body of a deceased individual is found, the law enforcement agency receiving the report shall immediately enter identifying and descriptive information about the unidentified body into the computerized system of the clearinghouse according to standards established by the center and the Federal Bureau of Investigation.

When an individual is found whose identity is unknown and cannot be readily determined, the law enforcement agency receiving the report shall immediately enter identifying and descriptive information about the individual into the computerized system of the clearinghouse according to standards established by the center and the Federal Bureau of Investigation.

As used in this section:

Who is eighteen (18) years of age or older;

Whose residence is in Arkansas or is believed to be in Arkansas; and

Who has been reported to a law enforcement agency as missing under circumstances indicating that:

The individual has a physical or mental disability as evidenced by written documentation;

The individual is missing under circumstances indicating that the disappearance was not voluntary;

The individual is missing under circumstances indicating that the individual's safety may be in danger; or

The individual is missing as a result of a natural or intentionally caused catastrophe;

Who is under eighteen (18) years of age;

Whose residence is in Arkansas or is believed to be in Arkansas;

Whose location is unknown or who has been taken, enticed, or kept from any person entitled by law or a court decree or order to the right of custody; and

Who has been reported as missing to a law enforcement agency; and

“Missing person report” means a report prepared on a form designated by the center for use by law enforcement agencies to record missing persons information.

The Attorney General shall require each law enforcement agency to comply with the mandatory entry provisions found in subdivisions (d)(1) and (2) of this section and in subsections (f) and (g) of this section and may seek writs of mandamus or other appropriate remedies to enforce this section.

Missing person entries and unidentified deceased person entries, regardless of age, shall remain in the computerized system of the clearinghouse indefinitely or until the missing person is located or returns or positive identification is obtained and the investigation is completed and closed.

The clearinghouse may assist in:

Public notification;

Providing informational resources to families of missing persons; and

Constructing and distributing missing person flyers.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (c)(4).

Cross References. Fines, §5-4-201.

Imprisonment, §5-4-401.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment inserted (d)(2) and redesignated former (d)(2) as (d)(3).

Amendments. The 2007 amendment added (a)(2).

The 2009 amendment, in (c), substituted “knowingly fails” for “shall willfully fail,” substituted “rule” for “regulation,” substituted “upon conviction is” for “shall be found,” substituted “violation and” for “misdemeanor and upon conviction,” and made minor stylistic changes.

Upon conviction, any person violating subdivision (b)(3)(A) of this section shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

Amendments. The 2007 amendment substituted “Board for” for “Board of” in (a)(2); and in (c), added “Except as provided in subdivision (c)(2) of this section” in present (c)(1), added (c)(2), and made related changes.

The 2009 amendment inserted “or to a vendor designated by the Department of Finance and Administration” in (e).

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (a)(2).

Cross References. Constable training requirements and uniform requirements, §14-14-1314.

Fines, §5-4-201.

Imprisonment, §5-4-401.

Training for constables, §12-9-115.

(1)Except as provided in subdivision (c)(2) of this section, an elected law enforcement officer of a political subdivision of this state shall not be allowed access to information from the center unless either the elected law enforcement officer or a law enforcement officer within his or her department has successfully completed the preparatory program of police training required by the Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training for certification of law enforcement officers.
